Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1097.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 5545.1. Use of live pigeons for target.(a) Offense defined.--A person commits a summary offense if the person willfully organizes, operates, conducts or knowingly permits a premises to be owned, leased or used for a contest event in which live pigeons are used as targets for either amusement or as a test of skill in marksmanship that are launched or otherwise immediately presented to the shooter either manually or with electronic or mechanical assistance from a fixed location or locations within a predefined shooting 1234567891011121314151617 field.(b) Applicability.--Nothing under this section shall be construed to apply to activity which is authorized or permitted under 34 Pa.C.S. (relating to game), the training of dogs for activity which is authorized or permitted under 34 Pa.C.S. or a special permit under 58 Pa. Code Ch. 147 (relating to special permits).Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1097PN1211 - 2 - 12345678